Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Part 3. Receipts Normally Apportioned.

§ 64.2-1016.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 354, cl. 2.

History.

1999, c. 975, § 55-277.17; 2012, c. 614; repealed by 2022, c. 354.

§ 64.2-1017.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 354, cl. 2.

History.

1999, c. 975, § 55-277.18; 2009, c. 477; 2012, c. 614; repealed by 2022, c. 354.

§ 64.2-1018.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 354, cl. 2.

History.

1999, c. 975, § 55-277.19; 2012, c. 614; repealed by 2022, c. 354.

§ 64.2-1019.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 354, cl. 2.

History.

1999, c. 975, § 55-277.20; 2012, c. 614; repealed by 2022, c. 354.

§ 64.2-1020.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 354, cl. 2.

History.

1999, c. 975, § 55-277.21; 2012, c. 614; repealed by 2022, c. 354.

§ 64.2-1021.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 354, cl. 2.

History.

1999, c. 975, § 55-277.22; 2012, c. 614; repealed by 2022, c. 354.

§ 64.2-1022.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 354, cl. 2.

History.

1999, c. 975, § 55-277.23; 2012, c. 614; repealed by 2022, c. 354.

§ 64.2-1023.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 354, cl. 2.

History.

1999, c. 975, § 55-277.24; 2012, c. 614; repealed by 2022, c. 354.